Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2226
State CSF program; authorized; department; powers.

The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to have a state CSF program to protect the health and welfare of the citizens of Nebraska by providing nutritious foods donated for such program by the United States Department of Agriculture, nutrition education, and such other benefits as are available to elderly persons in Nebraska who are low income and vulnerable to malnutrition as long as federal funds are available from the CSF program and are granted to the department.

To the extent consistent with state law, the Department of Health and Human Services may establish, operate, and maintain the program in a way that will qualify it to receive federal funds and that is uniform with United States Department of Agriculture's standards, enter into agreements with the federal government to establish a CSF program, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement a CSF program which are consistent with federal regulations and such other rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the CSF program, and enter into such other agreements as may be necessary to implement the program within this state.

Laws 1987, LB 643, § 18;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 22;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 619;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 23.
July 18, 2026